Washington statutes.
RCW 18.89.140

Renewal of licenses—Continuing education.

Licenses shall be renewed according to administrative procedures, administrative requirements, continuing education requirements, and fees determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A minimum of thirty hours of continuing education approved by the secretary must be completed every two years to meet the continuing education requirements under this section.

[ 2000 c 93 s 43; 1997 c 334 s 11; 1996 c 191 s 78; 1991 c 3 s 237; 1987 c 415 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1997 c 334: See note following RCW 18.89.010.